Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 3. Excise Tax on Certain Tobacco Products.

Sec. 43.50.300.
Excise tax levied.

An excise tax is levied on tobacco products in the state at the rate of 75 percent of the wholesale price of the tobacco products. The tax is levied when a person

brings, or causes to be brought, a tobacco product into the state from outside the state for sale;

makes, manufactures, or fabricates a tobacco product in the state for sale in the state; or

ships or transports a tobacco product to a retailer in the state for sale by the retailer.

History.

(§ 4 ch 125 SLA 1988; am § 5 ch 48 SLA 1997)

Sec. 43.50.310.
Exemptions.

A facility operated by one of the uniformed services of the United States is exempt from the tax. In this subsection, “uniformed services” has the meaning given in 5 U.S.C. 2101.

The tax does not apply to a tobacco product if the United States Constitution or other federal laws prohibit the levying of the tax on the product by the state.

History.

(§ 4 ch 125 SLA 1988)

Sec. 43.50.320.
Licensing.

Except as provided in (g) of this section, a person must be licensed by the department if the person engages in business as a distributor for a tobacco product that is subject to the tax.

The department, upon application and payment of a fee of $50, shall issue a license for one year to a person who applies for a license under (a) of this section.

The department may refuse to issue a license under this section if there is reasonable cause to believe the information submitted in the application is false or misleading and is not made in good faith.

A license issued under this section must include the name and address of the licensee, the type of business to be conducted, and the year for which the license is issued.

The department may renew a license issued under this section for a fee of $50.

The department may suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a license issued under this section as provided in AS

43.50.070

.

A license required by this section is in addition to any other license required by law, except that a person who is licensed under AS

43.50.010

—

43.50.180

is exempt from the licensing requirements of this section.

A license issued under this section is not assignable or transferable, except that in the case of death, bankruptcy, receivership, or incompetency of the licensee, or if the business of the licensee is transferred to another by operation of law, the department may extend the license for a limited time to the executor, administrator, trustee, receiver, or the transferee.

History.

(§ 4 ch 125 SLA 1988; am § 16 ch 109 SLA 2003)

Sec. 43.50.330.
Returns.

On or before the last day of each calendar month, a licensee shall file a return with the department. The return must state the number or amount of tobacco products sold by the licensee during the preceding calendar month, the selling price of the tobacco products, and the amount of tax imposed on the tobacco products.

The licensee shall remit with the return the tax due under AS

43.50.300

for the month covered by the return, after deducting four-tenths of one percent of the tax due, which the licensee shall retain to cover the expense of accounting and filing the return.

History.

(§ 4 ch 125 SLA 1988; am § 6 ch 48 SLA 1997)

Sec. 43.50.335.
Tax credits and refunds.

The department shall adopt procedures for a refund or credit to a licensee of the tax paid for tobacco products that have become unfit for sale, are destroyed, or are returned to the manufacturer for credit or replacement if the licensee provides proof acceptable to the department that the tobacco products have not been and will not be consumed in this state.

History.

(§ 17 ch 109 SLA 2003)

Sec. 43.50.340.
Records.

A licensee shall keep a complete and accurate record of all tobacco products of the licensee subject to the tax, including purchase prices, sales prices, the names and addresses of the sellers and the purchasers, the dates of delivery, the quantities of tobacco products, and the trade names and brands. Statements and records required by this section must be in the form prescribed by the department, preserved for three years, and available for inspection upon demand by the department.

History.

(§ 4 ch 125 SLA 1988)

Sec. 43.50.350.
Disposition of proceeds.

The tax collected by the department shall be deposited in the general fund. The annual estimated balance in the account maintained by the commissioner of administration under AS

37.05.142

may be used by the legislature to make appropriations for health care, health research, health promotion, and health education programs.

History.

(§ 4 ch 125 SLA 1988; am § 17 ch 90 SLA 1991)

Sec. 43.50.360.
Annual report. [Repealed, § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994.]

Sec. 43.50.370.
Regulations.

The department shall adopt under the Administrative Procedure Act (AS 44.62) reasonable regulations that it considers necessary to carry out the provisions of AS

43.50.300

—

43.50.390

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 125 SLA 1988)

Sec. 43.50.390.
Definitions.

In AS

43.50.300

—

43.50.390

,

“distributor” means a person who

brings, or causes to be brought, a tobacco product into the state from outside the state for sale;

makes, manufactures, or fabricates a tobacco product in the state for sale in the state; or

ships or transports a tobacco product to a retailer in the state for sale by the retailer;

“licensee” means a distributor who is

licensed under AS

43.50.320

; or

exempted by AS

43.50.320

(g) from licensing under AS 43.50.320;

“the tax” means the tax levied by AS

43.50.300

;

“tobacco product” means

a cigar;

a cheroot;

a stogie;

a perique;

snuff and snuff flour;

smoking tobacco, including granulated, plug-cut, crimp-cut, ready-rubbed, and any form of tobacco suitable for smoking in a pipe or cigarette;

chewing tobacco, including cavendish, twist, plug, scrap, and tobacco suitable for chewing; or

an article or product made of tobacco or a tobacco substitute, but not including a cigarette as defined in AS

43.50.170

;

“wholesale price” means

the established price for which a manufacturer sells a tobacco product to a distributor after deduction of a discount or other reduction received by the distributor for quantity or cash if the manufacturer’s established price is adequately supported by bona fide arm’s length sales as determined by the department; or

the price, as determined by the department, for which tobacco products of comparable retail price are sold to distributors in the ordinary course of trade if the manufacturer’s established price does not meet the standards of (A) of this paragraph.

History.

(§ 4 ch 125 SLA 1988; am § 18 ch 109 SLA 2003)